Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3422
Rules and regulations.

The department shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as it may deem necessary with reference
to the conditions under which the practice of genetic counseling shall be
carried on. The department shall have the power to enforce the Genetic Counseling
Practice Act.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 22.